zh-TW: 口氣芳香噴霧認證: 無氣溶膠; 無酒精; 無人工香料; 無人工防腐劑; 零殘忍; 牙醫推薦; 無染料; 歐盟有機; EWG 驗證; 公平貿易; 無氟; 無麩質; 清真; 猶太潔食; 天然成分; 非基改; 有機成分; PETA 核可; 無糖; 適合糖尿病患者; USDA 有機; 素食; 其他
tr: Nefes spreyi sertifikaları: Aerosol içermez; Alkolsüz; Yapay aromasız; Yapay koruyucusuz; Hayvan deneysiz; Diş hekimlerinin önerisi; Boyasız; AB organik; EWG onaylı; Adil ticaret; Florür içermez; Glütensiz; Helal; Kaşer; Doğal içerik; Non-GMO; Organik içerikler; PETA onaylı; Şekersiz; Şeker hastaları için uygundur; USDA organik; Vegan; Diğer
cs: Certifikace ústních sprejů: Bez aerosolu; Bez alkoholu; Bez umělých aromatických látek; Bez umělých konzervantů; Cruelty-free; Doporučeno zubním lékařem; Bez barviv; EU ekologické zemědělství; Ověřeno EWG; Fair trade; Bez fluoru; Bez lepku; Halal; Košer; Přírodní složky; Bez GMO; Organické složky; Schváleno PETA; Bez cukru; Vhodné pro diabetiky; USDA organic; Veganské; Jiné
fr: Certifications des rafraîchisseurs d’haleine: Sans aérosol; Sans alcool; Sans arômes artificiels; Sans conservateurs artificiels; Non testé sur les animaux; Recommandé par les dentistes; Sans colorant; Bio UE; Approuvé par l’EWG; Commerce équitable; Sans fluor; Sans gluten; Halal; Kosher; Ingrédients naturels; Sans OGM; Ingrédients bio; Agréé PETA; Sans sucre; Convient aux diabétiques; Bio USDA; Vegan; Autre
th: ใบรับรองสเปรย์ระงับกลิ่นปาก: ปราศจากละอองลอย; ปราศจากแอลกอฮอล์; ปราศจากสารให้กลิ่นรสสังเคราะห์; ปลอดสารกันเสียสังเคราะห์; ปลอดการทารุณยกรรมสัตว์; ทันตแพทย์แนะนำ; ปราศจากสีย้อม; ได้รับตรารับรอง EU Organic; ผ่านการตรวจสอบโดย EWG; การค้าที่เป็นธรรม; ปราศจากฟลูออไรด์; ปราศจากกลูเตน; ฮาลาล; โคเชอร์; มีส่วนประกอบจากธรรมชาติ; Non-GMO; ส่วนประกอบออร์แกนิก; ได้รับการอนุมัติจาก PETA; ปราศจากน้ำตาล; เหมาะสำหรับผู้ป่วยโรคเบาหวาน; ได้รับตรารับรอง USDA Organic; วีแกน; อื่นๆ
es: Certificaciones de espráis para el aliento: Sin aerosoles; Sin alcohol; Sin sabores artificiales; Sin conservantes artificiales; Libre de crueldad; Recomendado por dentistas; Sin tintes; Orgánico según la UE; Verificado por EWG; Precio justo; Sin fluoruro; Sin gluten; Halal; Kosher; Ingredientes naturales; No transgénico (Non-GMO); Ingredientes orgánicos; Aprobado por PETA; Sin azúcar; Apto para personas diabéticas; Orgánico según el USDA; Vegano; Otros
hr-HR: Certifikati sprejeva za osvježavanje daha: Bez aerosola; Bez alkohola; Bez umjetnih okusa; Bez umjetnih konzervansa; Nije testirano na životinjama; Preporuka stomatologa; Bez boja; Organski prema standardima EU-a; Odobrio EWG; Pravedna trgovina; Bez fluora; Bez glutena; Halal; Kosher; Prirodni sastojci; Bez GMO-a; Organski sastojci; Odobrila PETA; Bez šećera; Pogodno za dijabetičare; Organski prema standardima USDA-a; Veganski; Ostalo
sl-SI: Certifikati za osvežilce daha v spreju: Brez aerosolov; Brez alkohola; Brez umetne arome; Brez umetnih konzervansov; Ni testirano na živalih; Priporoča zobozdravnik; Brez barvil; EU organsko; EWG preverjeno; Pravična trgovina; Brez fluorida; Brez glutena; Halal; Košer; Naravne sestavine; Brez GSO; Organske sestavine; PETA odobrena; Brez sladkorja; Primerno za diabetike; USDA organsko; Vegansko; Drugo
hu: Leheletfrissítő spray tanúsítványai: Aeroszolmentes; Alkoholmentes; Mesterséges aroma nélküli; Mesterséges tartósítószer nélküli; Állatokon nem tesztelt; Fogorvosok által ajánlott; Színezékmentes; Megfelel az EU ökológiai szabványainak; EWG által tanúsított; Tisztességes kereskedelem; Fluoridmentes; Gluténmentes; Halal; Kóser; Természetes összetevők; Nem génmódosított; Organikus összetevők; PETA által jóváhagyott; Cukormentes; Cukorbetegek is használhatják; Megfelel az USDA ökológiai szabványainak; Vegán; Egyéb
fi: Hengityssuihkesertifikaatit: Aerosoliton; Alkoholiton; Ei keinotekoisia makuaineita; Ei keinotekoisia säilöntäaineita; Väkivallaton; Hammaslääkärin suosittelema; Väriaineeton; EU-luomu; EWG-varmennettu; Reilu kauppa; Fluoriton; Gluteeniton; Halal; Kosher; Luonnolliset ainesosat; GMO-vapaa; Luomuainesosat; PETA:n hyväksymä; Sokeriton; Soveltuu diabeetikoille; USDA-luomu; Vegaani; Muu
ko: 구강 청정 스프레이 인증: 에어로졸 프리; 무알코올; 무인공 향료; 무인공 방부제; 동물 실험 반대; 치과의사 추천; 무염료; EU 유기농; EWG 인증; 공정무역; 불소 무첨가; 글루텐프리; 할랄; 코셔; 천연 성분; 비GMO; 유기농 성분; PETA 승인; 무설탕; 당뇨 환자에게 적합; USDA 유기농; 비건; 기타
nb: Sertifiseringer for pustespray: Aerosol-free; Alkoholfri; Fri for kunstig smak; Fri for kunstige konserveringsmidler; Dyrevennlig; Anbefales av tannlege; Fargefri; EU-økologisk; EWG-verifisert; Rettferdig handel; Fluorfri; Glutenfri; Halal; Kosher; Naturlige ingredienser; Ikke-GMO; Økologiske ingredienser; PETA-godkjent; Sukkerfri; Egnet for diabetikere; USDA-økologisk; Vegan; Annet
ru: Сертификация освежителя для полости рта: Без аэрозоля; Без спирта; Без искусственных ароматизаторов; Без искусственных консервантов; Не тестируется на животных; Рекомендовано стоматологами; Без красителей; Органический продукт ЕС; Проверено EWG; Честная торговля; Без фтора; Без глютена; Халяль; Кошерный; Натуральные ингредиенты; Без ГМО; Органические ингредиенты; Одобрено PETA; Без сахара; Подходит для диабетиков; Органический продукт USDA; Веганский; Другое
pt-PT: Certificações de sprays para o hálito: Sem aerossol; Sem álcool; Sem aromas artificiais; Sem conservantes artificiais; Livre de crueldade; Dentista recomendado; Sem corantes; Certificação orgânica pela UE; Verificado pelo EWG; Comércio justo; Sem flúor; Não tem glúten; Halal; Kosher; Ingredientes naturais; Sem OGM; Ingredientes orgânicos; Aprovado pela PETA; Sem açúcar; Adequado para diabéticos; Certificação orgânica pela USDA; Vegano; Outro
da: Åndedrætsspray-certificeringer: Aerosolfri; Alkoholfri; Fri for kunstige smagsstoffer; Fri for kunstige konserveringsmidler; Ikke testet på dyr; Tandlægeanbefalet; Farvefri; EU-økologisk; EWG-verificeret; Fair Trade; Fluor-fri; Glutenfri; Halal; Kosher; Naturlige ingredienser; Ingen GMO; Økologiske ingredienser; PETA-godkendt; Sukkerfri; Velegnet til diabetikere; USDA-økologisk; Vegansk; Andet
el: Πιστοποιήσεις σπρέι για δροσερή αναπνοή: Χωρίς αεροζόλ; Χωρίς αλκοόλ; Χωρίς τεχνητή γεύση; Χωρίς τεχνητά συντηρητικά; Φιλικό προς τα ζώα; Συνιστάται από οδοντιάτρους; Χωρίς χρωστικές; Βιολογικής παραγωγής της ΕΕ; Πιστοποιημένο από το EWG; Δίκαιου εμπορίου; Χωρίς φθόριο; Χωρίς γλουτένη; Χαλάλ; Κόσερ; Φυσικά συστατικά; Χωρίς ΓΤΟ; Βιολογικά συστατικά; Εγκεκριμένο από την PETA; Χωρίς ζάχαρη; Κατάλληλο για διαβητικούς; Βιολογικό προϊόν εγκεκριμένο από το αμερικανικό Υπουργείο Γεωργίας; Βίγκαν; Άλλο
lt-LT: Burnos gaiviklio sertifikatai: Be aerozolio; Be alkoholio; Be dirbtinių kvapiklių; Be dirbtinių konservantų; Draugiški gyvūnams; Rekomenduoti odontologų; Be dažiklių; ES ekologiški; EWG patvirtinti; Sąžininga prekyba; Be fluorido; Be glitimo; Chalalinė; Košerinė; Natūralūs ingredientai; Be GMO; Ekologiški ingredientai; Patvirtintas PETA; Be cukraus; Tinka sergantiems diabetu; USDA ekologiški; Veganiški; Kita
nl: Certificeringen ademsprays: Aerosolvrij; Alcoholvrij; Vrij van kunstmatige smaakstoffen; Zonder kunstmatige conserveringsmiddelen; Diervriendelijk; Aanbevolen door tandartsen; Kleurstofvrij; EU biologisch; Gecontroleerd door EWG; Fair trade; Fluoridevrij; Glutenvrij; Halal; Koosjer; Natuurlijke ingrediënten; Non-GMO; Biologische ingrediënten; Goedgekeurd door PETA; Suikervrij; Geschikt voor diabetici; USDA-biologisch; Vegan; Andere
sk-SK: Certifikácia ústnych dezodorantov: Bez aerosólu; Bez alkoholu; Bez umelých príchutí; Bez umelých konzervantov; Netestované na zvieratách; Odporúčané zubármi; Bez farbív; EÚ bio; EWG overené; Fair trade; Bez fluoridu; Bezlepkové; Halal; Kóšer; Prírodné zložky; Bez GMO; Organické prísady; Schválené PETA; Bez cukru; Vhodné pre diabetikov; Bio USDA; Vegánsky; Iné
ro-RO: Certificări pentru sprayuri pentru împrospătarea respirației: Fără aerosoli; Fără alcool; Fără arome artificiale; Fără conservanți artificiali; Fără cruzime față de animale; Recomandat de dentist; Fără vopsea; Organic UE; Verificat EWG; Comerț echitabil; Fără fluor; Fără gluten; Halal; Cușer; Ingrediente naturale; Fără OMG; Ingrediente organice; Aprobat PETA; Fără zahăr; Adecvat pentru diabetici; Organic USDA; Vegan; Altele
ja: 口臭予防スプレーの認証: エアロゾルフリー; アルコールフリー; 人工香料不使用; 人工保存料不使用; クルエルティフリー; 歯科医推奨; 染料フリー; EUオーガニック認証; EWG認証; フェアトレード; フッ素フリー; グルテンフリー; ハラール; コーシャー; 天然成分; Non-GMO (非遺伝子組み換え); オーガニック成分; FDA承認; 砂糖不使用; 糖尿病患者に適している; USDAオーガニック認証; ビーガン; その他
de: Zertifizierungen des Atemsprays: Aerosolfrei; Alkoholfrei; Ohne künstliche Aromen; Ohne künstliche Konservierungsstoffe; Ohne Tierversuche; Vom Zahnarzt empfohlen; Farbstofffrei; EU-Bio; EWG-verifiziert; Fair Trade; Fluoridfrei; Glutenfrei; Halal; Koscher; Natürliche Inhaltsstoffe; Nicht gentechnisch verändert; Bio-Inhaltsstoffe; Von PETA befürwortet; Zuckerfrei; Für Diabetiker geeignet; USDA Organic; Vegan; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 口气清新剂认证: 无气溶胶; 不含酒精; 不含人工香料; 不含人工防腐剂; 无残害动物实验; 牙医推荐; 无染料; 欧盟有机认证; EWG 认证; 公平贸易; 无氟; 无麸质; 清真; 犹太洁食; 天然成分; 非转基因; 有机成分; PETA 认可; 无糖; 适用于糖尿病患者; USDA 有机认证; 严格素食; 其他
vi: Chứng nhận thuốc xịt hơi thở: Aerosol-free; Không cồn; Không chứa hương vị nhân tạo; Không chứa chất bảo quản nhân tạo; Không thử nghiệm trên động vật; Nha sĩ khuyên dùng; Không có thuốc nhuộm; Chứng nhận hữu cơ EU; EWG đã xác minh; Thương mại công bằng; không chứa fluoride; Không chứa gluten; Halal; Kosher; Thành phần tự nhiên; Không biến đổi gen; Thành phần hữu cơ; PETA đã phê duyệt; Không đường; Phù hợp với người bị tiểu đường; Chứng nhận hữu cơ USDA; Vegan; Khác
en: Breath sprays certifications: Aerosol-free; Alcohol-free; Artificial flavor free; Artificial preservatives free; Cruelty-free; Dentist recommended; Dye-free; EU organic; EWG verified; Fair trade; Fluoride-free; Gluten-free; Halal; Kosher; Natural ingredients; Non-GMO; Organic ingredients; PETA approved; Sugar-free; Suitable for diabetics; USDA organic; Vegan; Other
it: Certificazioni degli spray per l’alito: Aerosol-free; Senza alcol; Senza aromi artificiali; Senza conservanti artificiali; Cruelty-free; Consigliato dai dentisti; Senza coloranti; Biologico UE; Controllato da EWG; Commercio equo e solidale; Senza fluoro; Senza glutine; Halal; Kosher; Ingredienti naturali; Senza OGM; Ingredienti biologici; Approvato dalla PETA; Senza zucchero; Adatto per persone con diabete; Biologico USDA; Vegan; Altro
pl: Certyfikaty odświeżaczy do ust: Nie zawiera aerozolu; Bezalkoholowy; Bez sztucznych aromatów; Bez sztucznych konserwantów; Nietestowany na zwierzętach; Zalecany przez dentystę; Bezbarwny; Certyfikat ekologiczny UE; Zweryfikowano w EWG; Sprawiedliwy handel; Bez fluoru; Bezglutenowy; Halal; Koszerna; Naturalne składniki; Bez GMO; Składniki organiczne; Zatwierdzone przez PETA; Bezcukrowa; Odpowiedni dla diabetyków; USDA organiczne; Wegańska; Inne
sv: Certifieringar för munsprayer: Aerosolfri; Alkoholfri; Fri från konstgjorda smakämnen; Fri från konstgjorda konserveringsmedel; Plågeri-fri; Rekommenderas av tandläkare; Färgfri; EU-organisk; EWG-verifierad; Rättvis handel; Fluorfri; Glutenfri; Halal; Kosher; Naturliga ingredienser; Icke-GMO; Ekologiska ingredienser; PETA-godkänd; Sockerfri; Lämplig för diabetiker; USDA-organisk; Vegan; Övrigt
pt-BR: Certificações de borrifadores bucais: Sem aerossol; Não contém álcool; Sem aromas artificiais; Sem conservantes artificiais; Livre de crueldade; Recomendado por dentistas; Sem corantes; Orgânico da UE; Com verificação EWG; Feira comercial; Sem flúor; Sem glúten; Halal; Kosher; Ingredientes naturais; Não contém transgênicos; Ingredientes orgânicos; Aprovado pela PETA; Não contém açúcar; Adequado para diabéticos; USDA orgânico; Vegano; Outro
bg-BG: Сертификати за освежители за уста: Без аерозол; Без алкохол; Без изкуствени аромати; Без изкуствени консерванти; Без жестокости над животни; Препоръчан от зъболекар; Без багрила; Органични продукти на ЕС; Проверено от EWG; Справедлива търговия; Без флуорид; Без глутен; Халал; Кошер; Естествени съставки; Без ГМО; Органични съставки; Одобрен от PETA; Без захар; Подходящ за диабетици; Органични продукти на USDA; Веган; Други